Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2925
Person, defined.

Person means any individual, governmental entity, corporation, society, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint-stock company, association, or any other corporate body or legal entity.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 25.